Utah statutes.
31A-19a-401.   Scope of part.

(1)  This part applies to workers' compensation insurance and employers' liability insurance written in connection with it.

(2)  All insurers writing workers' compensation coverage, including the Workers' Compensation Fund created under Chapter 33, are subject to this part.



Amended by Chapter 222, 2000 General Session

